Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.721

Revenues derived from certain university lands deposited in University of Washington bond retirement fund.

All moneys received from the lease or rental of lands set apart by the enabling act for university purposes; all interest or income arising from the proceeds of the sale of such lands or of the timber, fallen timber, stone, gravel, or other valuable material thereon; and all moneys received as interest on deferred payments on contracts for the sale of such lands shall be deposited in the "University of Washington bond retirement fund" to be expended for the purposes set forth in RCW 28B.20.720.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.721. Prior: 1963 c 216 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.541.]